Maryland, session 2026, SB0021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
5–1009.
(A) A person 62 years old or older who possesses a Maryland Golden Age Pass[,]
issued by the Maryland Park Service[, may]:
(1) IS ENTITLED TO FREE DAY–USE ENTRY TO ANY STATE PARK THAT
CHARGES SERVICE FEES;
(2) MAY camp overnight in any State park at one–half of the established
fee [Monday] SUNDAY through Thursday, excluding holidays; AND
(3) MAY LAUNCH A BOAT AT ANY STATE PARK WITHOUT PAYING A
BOAT LAUNCH FEE.
(B) IF A PER–VEHICLE FEE IS IN EFFECT AT A STATE PARK, THE FREE
DAY–USE ENTRY UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION APPLIES TO
EVERYONE IN THE VEHICLE WITH THE HOLDER OF A MARYLAND GOLDEN AGE PASS.
– 1 –

Ch. 333 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 2 –